src/fst/stems/verb_stems.lexc
LEXICON TR-yi-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yii-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-POT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-POT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-PROG
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-DO3SG-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-nii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-sis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-yis-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-SS-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-yi-POT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;


LEXICON VerbSuffixes
# ;

LEXICON Transitive
disá[chase_O]:di.sáł	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os09338, os09339, os09340, os09341, os09344
ditł'ù[hang_self]:nádi=di.tł'ush	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os06313
dzádisit[tire_out_O]:dzá=di.zìł	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os08745
díyí[be_related_to]:dí.yí	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07737
gwàdizál[spread_GO_out]:gwà_di.zál	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os03777, os03781
gwádzánì[become_aware_of]:gwádzá=nit	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os08618, os08619, os08620
idìkòd[pat_mouth]:idì=kòd	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11881, os11882, os11883, os11886, os11887, os11888
igúd[stab]:gúd	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09956
ik'anatłá[pursue_walking]:ik'ana=tłáł	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os07547, os07548, os07549, os07551, os07552
ikidástín[place_AO_under]:ikidá=tín	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06567
iná[grab_O]:ni	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10879
ischút[get_hold_of_O]:i.chút	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os07015
istsad[eat_O]:tsad	TR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os01709, os01710, os01711, os01712, os01713, os01714, os01715
istsin[smell_O]:tsín	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os06871
istsád[eat_O]:tsàd	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10846, os10848, os10853
iyistsàd:i=tsàd	TR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07454
izììz[sip_tea]:zííz	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04569, os04570, os04571, os04572
k'asdá[wipe_O_off]:k'aná=dish	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06900, os06901
k'asdá[wipe_O_off]:k'a=dá	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os06898
k'àʔód[untie_O]:k'à=ʔòd	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07667, os07668, os07669, os07670, os07671, os07672, os07673
káádìtò[look_for_O]:kóna=dì.tosh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os10318
kúyá[walk_ahead_of_O]:kú=yá	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06250, os06251, os06252
nask'ós[throw_RO_down]:nàná=k'òsh	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os05545
nask'ós[throw_RO_down]:na=k'ós	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os05543
natòghàgàd[cut_to_pieces]:natòghà=gàd	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os08208
niyiwuł[chase_O_along]:ni.wuł	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os04490
nàghò[thrust_SO_down]:nà=ghò	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06365
nàsxàł[throw_O_off]:nà=xàł	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os05535, os05536
nàtł'is[roll_SO_down]:nà=tł'os	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06359
nàtł'is[roll_SO_down]:nà=tł'is	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06361
násʔí[look]:ná=ʔí	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os07460, os07461
násʔín[look_at_O]:ná=ná.ʔìsh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os00510, os00511, os00512, os00513, os00514, os00515, os00516
násʔín[watch_O]:ná.ʔín	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11986, os11987
oghàyino[take_care_of_O]:oghà=no	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06264, os06266, os06268
taditsił[wash_O]:taná=didi.chiłsh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os01543
taʔò[put_RO_up]:taná=ʔosh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os00775, os00776, os00777, os00778, os00779, os00780, os00781
tłíditì[put_SO_into_fire]:tłí=di.tón	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08288, os08291
tłíyiʔò[put_RO_in_fire]:tłíyi=ʔón	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08299, os08301, os08303
xástsàł[chop_O_out]:k'á=tsíl	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02439
yiʔín[see_O]:ʔín	TR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os00487, os00488, os00489, os00490, os00491, os00492, os00493, os00494
yìt'ás[put_legging_on]:yì=t'ás	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os08873
yích'uł[be_dragging]:ch'uł	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os04393, os04395, os04396, os04397
àdisduw[drum_O]:à=di.duw	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os06751
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:ná=í.nish	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os03357
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:í.nish	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os03356
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:à=nììzh	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os03368
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:í.nił	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os03351, os03352, os03353, os03354, os03355
ánádiyinòt[touch_O]:áná=di.nòsh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os04641
ásdí[train_O]:á=dìn	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02449
ìsts'íst[wrap_O]:ì.ts'íst	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02376, os02377, os02378, os02379
ìzíl[heat_up]:ì.zíł	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os01558
ích'ún[be_cautious_of_O]:í.ch'ún	TR-yii-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09242, os09243
ísgàs[bite_O]:ná=í.gish	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os11683
ísní[push_O_with_hand]:í.nił	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os03350
ísxas[gnaw_O]:ghàz	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10826, os10827, os10828, os10829
LEXICON Transitive-SubjSuppr
dinisdlú[get_startled_again]:nádini.dlút	TR-SS-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12215, os12216
disyàt[singe]:di.yàt	TR-SS-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os03574, os03575, os03576
ditsòs[stretch]:di.tsòs	TR-SS-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07587
dísdo[pile_up_O_carelessly]:dí.do	TR-SS-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os05223, os05224
dísdùk'[pile_up_O]:dí.duk'	TR-SS-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os05222
guk'átòs[cut_off_area]:guk'á=tòs	TR-SS-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09141
guk'átòs[cut_off_area]:guk'á=tòs	TR-SS-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09142
isdùwà[consume]:dùwà	TR-SS-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10487
ist'ó[feather_arrow]:t'ón	TR-SS-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04719, os04720, os04721
k'adiyídís[wind_O_around]:k'a=diyí.dís	TR-SS-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os12332
k'asdá[wipe_O_off]:k'a=dày	TR-SS-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06890
k'àdiskòd[put_patch_O]:ik'à=di.kod	TR-SS-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os03031
k'ánisch'úł[tear_off_O]:k'á=ni.ch'úł	TR-SS-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10295
k'ánisch'úł[tear_off_O]:k'á=ni.ch'úł	TR-SS-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10294, os10296
k'átòs[cut_off]:k'á=t'ós	TR-SS-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09140
màdigáts'[make_thumping]:à=di.gáts'	TR-SS-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06752
nàgudistłód[stop_storm]:nà=gu_di.tłód	TR-SS-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os12106, os12107
nàgudistłód[stop_storm]:nà=gu_di.tłód	TR-SS-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12103
nàgudistłód[stop_storm]:nà=gu_di.tłód	TR-SS-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12102
nànistòs[tattoo_O]:nà=ni.tòòz	TR-SS-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12152, os12153, os12154, os12163
nàsgu[pour_O_off]:nà=gu	TR-SS-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06386
nàsgu[pour_O_off]:nà=gu	TR-SS-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06390
násgòn[dry_O]:ná=gòn	TR-SS-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04459
náyigół[be_drying]:ná=gół	TR-SS-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os04466
náyìsts'íl[shrivel]:ná=yì.ts'ìl	TR-SS-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11715
oghàgùstłó[give_O]:oghà=gù_tłísh	TR-SS-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os09163
oghágùt'a[pity_O]:oghá=gù_t'a	TR-SS-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10818
tagosh[paint_O_black]:ta=gosh	TR-SS-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02359, os02363, os02366
tatùn[shatter]:ta=tùn	TR-SS-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02444
tayidinists'ìst[fill_up_O]:ta=dìni.ts'ìst	TR-SS-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02094, os02097, os02098
tayidinists'ìst[fill_up_O]:ta=dìni.ts'ìst	TR-SS-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02093, os02095
tayidinists'ìst[fill_up_O]:ta=dìni.ts'ìst	TR-SS-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os02096, os02099
tàdists'í[blow_upwards]:tà=di.ts'í	TR-SS-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10998, os10999, os11000
xàsgàs[bite_chunk_of_O]:xà=gàs	TR-SS-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02357, os02358
xákàd:xá=di.kàd	TR-SS-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02567
ách'ìgùshòt[forget_O]:ách'ì=gù_sháy	TR-SS-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04736
áchágúdìnisghás[lengthen_O]:áchá=gú_dìni.ghás	TR-SS-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11904
ásdí[train_O]:á=dìn	TR-SS-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02450
ìdit'ú[shoot_O]:ìdi.t'úw	TR-SS-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11788, os11789, os11790
ích'ún[be_cautious_of_O]:í.ch'ún	TR-SS-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09246
ídistòy[count_O]:ídi.tòy	TR-SS-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02592
